Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.340

Notice to alien property custodian—Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 4.28.330 through 4.28.350:

(1) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association and corporation;

(2) "Designated enemy country" means any foreign country as to which the United States has declared the existence of a state of war and any other country with which the United States is at war in the future;

(3) "Enemy-occupied territory" means any place under the control of any designated enemy country or any place with which, by reason of the existence of a state of war, the United States does not maintain postal communication.

[ 1943 c 62 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 254-2.]